test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-woi_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - woi: # Noun 'boy; son' - full paradigm
     woi+N+Sg: woi
     woi+N+Sg+DemDistal: wodcha
     woi+N+Sg+DemProx: wodno
     woi+N+Sg+DemEgo: wodni
     woi+N+Sg+PxSg1: woda
     woi+N+Sg+PxSg2: wodi
     woi+N+Sg+PxSg3: wode
     woi+N+Sg+PxPl1: wodwa
     woi+N+Sg+PxPl2: wodu
     woi+N+Sg+PxPl3: wodgi

     woi+N+Pl: yawoi
     woi+N+Pl+DemDistal: yawoika
     woi+N+Pl+DemProx: yawoigo
     woi+N+Pl+DemEgo: yawoigi
     woi+N+Pl+PxSg1: yawota
     woi+N+Pl+PxSg2: yawoti
     woi+N+Pl+PxSg3: yawote
     woi+N+Pl+PxPl1: yawotwa
     woi+N+Pl+PxPl2: yawotu
     woi+N+Pl+PxPl3: yawotgi
